Hawaii statutes.
§149A-32.5 Cancellation or suspension of
pesticide uses. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or executive order to the
contrary, the chairperson of the board of agriculture, in consultation with the
advisory committee on pesticides and also with the approval of the director of
health, shall suspend, cancel, or restrict the use of certain pesticides or
specific uses of certain pesticides when the usage is determined to have
unreasonable adverse effects on the environment. In addition to other
circumstances which may require a determination as to whether unreasonable
adverse effects exist, a determination shall be made:

(1) When residues of the pesticides are detected in
drinking water; or

(2) When a use under special local needs registration
involves a pesticide for which any use has been suspended or canceled by the
EPA. [L 1985, c 131, §1; am L 1987, c 310, §16]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next